Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 3. Burglary and Criminal Intrusion
§ 6-3-301.
Burglary; aggravated burglary; penalties.

A person is guilty of burglary if, without authority, he enters or remains in a building, occupied structure or vehicle, or separately secured or occupied portion thereof, with intent to commit theft or a felony therein.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, burglary is a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both.

Aggravated burglary is a felony punishable by imprisonment for not less than five (5) years nor more than twenty-five (25) years, a fine of not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00), or both, if, in the course of committing the crime of burglary, the person:

Is or becomes armed with or uses a deadly weapon or a simulated deadly weapon;

Knowingly or recklessly inflicts bodily injury on anyone; or

Attempts to inflict bodily injury on anyone.

As used in this section “in the course of committing the crime” includes the time during which an attempt to commit the crime or in which flight after the attempt or commission occurred.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 1985, ch. 44, § 1; 2013 ch. 191, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

Cross references. —

For definition of “occupied structure,” see §

6-1-104

.

As to committing murder during the course of a burglary, see §

6-2-101

.

As to breaking and entering a building declared a nuisance, see §

6-6-204

.

The 2013 amendment

, effective July 1, 2013, substituted “theft” for “larceny” in (a).

Prosecution for burglary and larceny constitutional. —

The defendant's constitutional rights against double jeopardy were not denied when the state was allowed to prosecute him for burglary and the lesser included offense of larceny in the same prosecution. Eatherton v. State, 761 P.2d 91,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 1988).

Sentence proportionate.—

Defendant's
sentence of 10 to 25 years for aggravated burglary was not extreme
because it was within the range of 5 to 25 years specified in the
statute; the sentencing court properly considered in fashioning an
appropriate sentence that defendant stole a gun and practiced with
it, and that he then broke into a house in the middle of the night
and used that gun to shoot and kill the victim in his bed, in front
of his wife. Sen v. State, 2017 WY 30, 390 P.3d 769,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 138 S. Ct. 225, 199 L. Ed. 2d 146, 2017 U.S. LEXIS 4668 (U.S. 2017).

There was
no indication in the record that the district court did not consider
the evidence relating to defendant youth in issuing the sentence
for
aggravated burglary or in imposing the entire sentencing package
because
the district court evaluated evidence relating to defendant's
criminal
history as a juvenile, his family and home environment,
his mental
and emotional development, and his potential for rehabilitation;
after
considering that evidence, the district court concluded that
a life
sentence without the possibility of parole was “inappropriate.” Sen v. State, 2017 WY 30, 390 P.3d 769,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 138 S. Ct. 225, 199 L. Ed. 2d 146, 2017 U.S. LEXIS 4668 (U.S. 2017).

Under former statute, finding that person was in lawful possession made unnecessary any inquiry into extent of authority

delegated to that person by his employer. Beane v. State, 596 P.2d 325,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 419

(Wyo. 1979).

Formation of intent to commit murder. —

The evidence supported the jury determination that defendant committed aggravated burglary when he entered the apartment with the intent to commit first degree murder or aggravated assault where defendant had called and threatened the victim repeatedly in the two weeks preceding the shooting, drove to Cody and parked on another street away from the apartment, made sure no one was in the apartment, and then entered the apartment armed with a crowbar which he traded for the gun that he found. Kenyon v. State, 2004 WY 100, 96 P.3d 1016,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 2004), reh'g denied,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. Sept. 29, 2004), cert. denied, 543 U.S. 1175, 125 S. Ct. 1389, 161 L. Ed. 2d 158, 2005 U.S. LEXIS 1883 (U.S. 2005).

Establishment of felonious entry. —

Entry is established by the presence of the allegedly stolen tools at closing time and their absence when the building was reopened the next morning, not more than 14 hours later, and any reasonable mind must conclude that in order to effect removal of the tools, entry was necessary, and the larceny could not have been committed without a felonious entry. Downs v. State, 581 P.2d 610,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 210

(Wyo. 1978).

Unlawful entry as element. —

The unlawful entry element is a crucial element for differentiating the crime of burglary from other crimes such as arson. Longstreth v. State, 832 P.2d 560,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 1992), reh'g denied,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. June 24, 1992).

In a prosecution for burglary with intent to commit arson, the state incorrectly argued that when the felony involved is arson, evidence of unlawful entry is not required, and the unlawful entry can be inferred or assumed based on the fact of the burning alone. Longstreth v. State, 832 P.2d 560,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 1992), reh'g denied,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. June 24, 1992).

Unlawful entry is made by putting through

the place broken a hand, a foot or any instrument with which it is intended to commit a felony. Mirich v. State, 593 P.2d 590,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 402

(Wyo. 1979).

Burglary committed whether person present or not. —

The crime of burglary as defined by subsection (a) of this section cannot be committed by the unauthorized entry of any vehicle, whether a person is present or not, with the intent to commit larceny therein. Collins v. State, 854 P.2d 688,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(Wyo. 1993), reh'g denied,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. July 20, 1993).

Meaning of “building.” —

In former statute, the phrase “any building” was held to include all structures. Ash v. State, 555 P.2d 221,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 219

(Wyo. 1976), reh'g denied, 560 P.2d 369,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1977), cert. denied, 434 U.S. 842, 98 S. Ct. 139, 54 L. Ed. 2d 106, 1977 U.S. LEXIS 3041 (U.S. 1977).

Storage trailer is a “building.” —

A semitrailer from which the wheels have been removed and which is used for storage at a construction site is a building within the meaning of subsection (a) of this section. Smith v. State, 902 P.2d 712,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 1995).

Separately secured or occupied portion of building. —

In order to qualify as “separately secured or occupied” within the meaning of the statute, a room or container must be large enough to be occupied by a human being. Paugh v. State, 9 P.3d 973,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 2000).

A locked three-foot fishing reel display case in a department store was not a “separately secured or occupied portion” of a building within the meaning of the statute as it was not large enough to be occupied by a human being. Paugh v. State, 9 P.3d 973,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 2000).

Burglary is crime requiring specific intent.

It is as essential for the state to prove the intent to steal or commit another felony beyond a reasonable doubt as it is to prove the breaking and entering itself. Jennings v. State, 806 P.2d 1299,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1991).

Burglary is crime requiring specific intent. —

In a burglary
case, a jury could reasonably conclude that although defendant was
not completely sober, he was able to form the requisite intent to
steal. Wiese v. State, 2016 WY 72, 375 P.3d 805,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 2016).

Intent to commit felony, but not attempt, required for conviction. —

To be convicted of burglary with intent to commit third-degree sexual assault, a defendant need not attempt to commit the assault, a felony; he need only intend to do so. Sears v. State, 632 P.2d 946,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 368

(Wyo. 1981).

Fact that nothing was taken from building does not destroy inference of intent

to steal at the time of entry. Mirich v. State, 593 P.2d 590,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 402

(Wyo. 1979).

Direct evidence to prove intent is not necessary.

Mirich v. State, 593 P.2d 590,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 402

(Wyo. 1979).

Inference of intent depends on circumstances. —

The circumstances from which a jury might properly have inferred the intent to steal are numerous and varied and the quantum of proof required necessarily depends upon the totality of the circumstances presented. Mirich v. State, 593 P.2d 590,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 402

(Wyo. 1979).

Knowledge of what a structure contains, coupled with an attempt to enter it, supports a rational inference of intent to steal whatever is of value within the building. Mirich v. State, 593 P.2d 590,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 402

(Wyo. 1979).

Where one breaks into the property of another in the nighttime, an inference may be drawn that he did so with the intent to commit larceny. Mirich v. State, 593 P.2d 590,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 402

(Wyo. 1979).

Flight or hiding will, under the proper circumstances, be sufficient evidence from which a jury might properly infer an intent to steal. Mirich v. State, 593 P.2d 590,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 402

(Wyo. 1979); Leppek v. State, 636 P.2d 1117,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 397

(Wyo. 1981).

Knowledge, attempt to enter, infer intent. —

Two factors, knowledge of the contents of a building and an attempt to enter the building, only

support

the inference that the defendant entered with the intent to steal; they do not

mandate

the conclusion that the defendant entered with the intent to steal. Bush v. State, 908 P.2d 963,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 230

(Wyo. 1995).

Opportunity considered in establishing guilt. —

Where defendant was in the immediate vicinity of the building for a day or two before commission of the crime, he had the opportunity to commit the crime, and evidence of opportunity to commit the crime is a link which considered with other incriminating facts may establish the guilt of the defendant. Downs v. State, 581 P.2d 610,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 210

(Wyo. 1978).

Possession strong evidence of guilt. —

The most significant and material evidence of defendant's guilt is his possession of the stolen property. Possession is a strong circumstance tending to show guilt, and only slight corroborative evidence of other inculpatory circumstances is required. Downs v. State, 581 P.2d 610,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 210

(Wyo. 1978). See also, Newell v. State, 548 P.2d 8,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 180

(Wyo. 1976).

There was sufficient evidence to convict defendant of eleven counts of burglary where defendant was found in possession of stolen items; there was slight corroborative evidence of other inculpatory circumstances based on the similarity of the crimes, a footprint found at the scene, and the fact that defendant was staying in the area. The crimes occurred late at night or early in the morning, the method of entry was the same in every case but one, items with very little value were always taken, and food was regularly eaten during the crimes.
Ferguson v. State, 2007 WY 157, 168 P.3d 476,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 2007).

Defendant's dealing with property as his own, by sale, is a corroborating circumstance.

Downs v. State, 581 P.2d 610,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 210

(Wyo. 1978).

As is opportunity.

Newell v. State, 548 P.2d 8,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 180

(Wyo. 1976).

And flight.

Newell v. State, 548 P.2d 8,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 180

(Wyo. 1976).

Opportunity and possession sufficient for conviction. —

Placing defendant in the area of the scene of the crime, along with possession of the stolen goods, is sufficient to sustain a conviction. Downs v. State, 581 P.2d 610,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 210

(Wyo. 1978).

Taking of information constitutes burglary. —

The defendant's unlawful entry of a dwelling to copy the victim's unlisted phone number, social security number and insurance policy number constituted burglary because such information can be considered property and its taking as larceny under §

6-3-402

.Dreiman v. State, 825 P.2d 758,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1992).

Unauthorized entry of unoccupied vehicle constitutes “burglary.” —

The crime of “burglary” as defined by subsection (a) can be committed by the unauthorized entry of any vehicle, whether a person is present or not, with the intent to commit larceny therein. Scott v. State, 856 P.2d 447,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1993).

Under former statute, attempt to commit burglary was in fact burglary.

State v. Lindsay, 77 Wyo. 410, 317 P.2d 506,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1957); Mirich v. State, 593 P.2d 590,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 402

(Wyo. 1979).

Burglary and criminal entry distinguished. —

Burglary and criminal trespass (now criminal entry) are, by design, separate and distinct violations of the law. The essential difference between the two crimes is the element of specific intent to steal or commit a felony therein, found in the burglary section. Mirich v. State, 593 P.2d 590,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 402

(Wyo. 1979).

Burglary and property destruction separate offenses. —

Burglary requires unauthorized entry of a building or vehicle; property destruction does not. Property destruction requires unauthorized destruction or injury to property; burglary does not. Even though both violations can arise from the same incident, each has an element not found in the other; burglary and property destruction are defined by different statutes with different elements and provide separate penalties and, therefore, constitute two separate offenses. Longstreth v. State, 890 P.2d 551,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1995).

Self-induced intoxication entitles defendant to criminal-entry instruction. —

In a burglary prosecution, given the evidence on self-induced intoxication, which could have been considered to determine whether the defendant was capable of forming the specific intent necessary to steal or deprive a person of his property, the defendant was entitled to an instruction on the lesser included offense of criminal entry, and the court's failure to give it was reversible error. Eatherton v. State, 761 P.2d 91,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 1988).

The court was required to instruct the jury on the lesser included offense of criminal entry, where the jury could infer from the evidence that the defendant was too intoxicated to form the specific intent requisite for a conviction of the charge of burglary, but still could decide that he had committed the offense of unlawful entry. Keller v. State, 771 P.2d 379,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 1989).

Commission of defendant's burglary terminated when he was arrested

and, for this reason, he was not acting “in the court of committing the crime” of aggravated burglary when he later assaulted the arresting peace officer. Simonds v. State, 762 P.2d 1189,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 1988).

Indictment. —

Burglary with intent to commit larceny and the larceny itself may be charged in one indictment. Ackerman v. State, 7 Wyo. 504, 54 P. 228,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1898).

Where former statute provided that where entry is made “with intent to steal or commit a felony” a crime has been committed, if the entry had been to commit some other felony than stealing, then that felony would have to be described in the indictment. The use of the statutory word “felony” by itself would be insufficient in that it is a generic term. Gonzales v. State, 551 P.2d 929,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(Wyo. 1976).

The use of the word “feloniously” in an indictment carries the same import as the word “intentionally.” Criminal intent is implied from the use of the word “feloniously.” Gonzales v. State, 551 P.2d 929,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(Wyo. 1976).

Indictment. —

Amending defendant's information to charge aggravated burglary on the morning of trial did not deprive defendant of due process because (1) defendant had notice in the final information of all aggravated burglary elements, and an aggravated burglary prosecution on the same facts was barred, (2) defendant could prepare a defense because prior informations said aggravated burglary was charged, despite citing the wrong subsection and penalty, (3) a new allegation of causing bodily injury had been pled as to aggravated assault and battery, and (4) defendant's greater penalty did not prejudice defendant's substantial rights, since defendant still pled not guilty after being advised of the penalty. Albarran v. State, 2013 WY 111, 309 P.3d 817,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 2013).

Evidence held admissible. —

Where, in prosecution for burglary, it was claimed that defendant broke and entered prosecutor's cabin and stole an overcoat and a bridle from prosecutor's locked trunk, evidence that defendant was seen in vicinity about time of burglary, that he afterwards was discovered wearing the coat, that he had sold bridle, that cabin was destroyed by fire, and that lock of the trunk was found in the ashes, its hasp bent and twisted, was admissible to identify defendant as the person who entered the cabin, and as showing his felonious intent. Delmont v. State, 15 Wyo. 271, 88 P. 623,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 15 Wyo. 271, 88 P. 623,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1907).

Based on evidence that defendant and his cohort forced a fellow gang member to burglarize the victim's home in retaliation for his renouncing his gang membership, defendant was convicted of burglary in violation of this section. The district court properly admitted evidence of defendant's gang affiliation to establish his motive for the burglary; the evidence was not received to show defendant's bad character or propensity to commit crimes.
Lascano v. State, 2011 WY 144, 262 P.3d 1259,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 2011).

Evidence held sufficient. —

Evidence was sufficient to sustain defendant's aggravated burglary and kidnapping convictions because the victim testified that defendant was “jealous,” and if he got into the house, “he was going to be very upset,” and defendant violently broke in through the back door, smashing glass, and breaking parts of the door jamb; he carried a knife. He pursued the victim when she escaped, he forcibly returned her to the house, and held her in her basement bedroom.
Counts v. State, 2012 WY 70, 277 P.3d 94,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 2012).

Evidence was sufficient to convict defendant of conspiracy to commit aggravated burglary, aggravated robbery, and aggravated assault and battery as the State presented evidence that defendant and the accomplice agreed to use the gun during the incident at the golf course because the golf course’s manager testified that after he hit defendant in the head with the flashlight, defendant turned and ran away; the manager then heard someone saying to shoot him; seconds later, the manager heard a gunshot and saw a muzzle flash; and it was reasonable for the jury to infer that the accomplice would have only said to shoot the manager if he knew defendant had a gun in his possession. Jordin v. State, 2018 WY 64, 419 P.3d 527,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 2018).

Evidence was sufficient to sustain defendant’s burglary conviction under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-3-301(a) (2017) where he texted the victim a picture of a missing page from her personal journal, and his continuing focus on the victim and pursuit of a romantic relationship was evidence of his motive to take the journal page. Bittleston v. State, 2019 WY 64, 442 P.3d 1287,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 2019).

Corroboration of defendant's statements. —

Sufficient
independent evidence was presented to corroborate defendant's extrajudicial
statements and to convict him of aggravated burglary; the victims
testified that no one had permission to enter their home or remove
a pistol. Dennis v. State, 2013 WY 67, 302 P.3d 890,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 2013).

Error in refusing instruction. —

In a prosecution for burglary based on defendant's entering and driving a vehicle without permission, the trial court erred in refusing to give his proposed instruction regarding the meaning of the word “deprive” in §

6-3-401

, since there was evidence that defendant intended only to make temporary use of the vehicle. Brett v. State, 961 P.2d 385,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1998).

In a prosecution for burglary based on defendant's entering and driving a vehicle without permission, the trial court erred in refusing to give his proposed instruction on self-induced intoxication, since there was competent evidence to support the instruction. Brett v. State, 961 P.2d 385,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1998).

Instruction properly refused. —

Where in a prosecution for burglary the defendant's offered instruction would have directed the jury to return a verdict of guilty of the lesser included offense of criminal trespass (now criminal entry), even in the face of obviously sufficient evidence of intent to steal, it was properly refused. Mirich v. State, 593 P.2d 590,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 402

(Wyo. 1979).

In burglary trial, trial court properly refused to give instructions on the lesser included offense of criminal entry where the defendant's theory of the case was that he never entered the burglarized vehicle at all. Collins v. State, 854 P.2d 688,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(Wyo. 1993), reh'g denied,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. July 20, 1993).

In a prosecution for burglary based on defendant's entering and driving a vehicle without permission, where the prosecutor's argument and evidence was that the felony defendant intended to commit was larceny, the trial court did not err in refusing to give defendant's proffered instruction defining “felony.” Brett v. State, 961 P.2d 385,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1998).

In a prosecution for burglary based on defendant's entering and driving a vehicle without permission, the trial court did not err in refusing to give defendant's proposed instruction defining the crime of unauthorized use of a vehicle. Brett v. State, 961 P.2d 385,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1998).

Inebriation applicable to specific intent of aggravated burglary. —

The jury instructions adequately informed the jury that the inebriated condition of the defendant was to be considered only with respect to the specific intent crime of aggravated burglary, and not with respect to the lesser included general intent crime of aggravated assault. McDonald v. State, 715 P.2d 209,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 497

(Wyo. 1986).

Defendant's taking and copying of victim's keys and calendar was larcenous

and evidence of such an act was sufficient to sustain his burglary conviction even though he had returned the property. Although the owner may retain the original property, there has been nevertheless a deprivation of property when a copy is made and retained by another. Dreiman v. State, 825 P.2d 758,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1992).

Evidence held sufficient. —

See Delmont v. State, 15 Wyo. 271, 88 P. 623,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 15 Wyo. 271, 88 P. 623,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1907); Cantrell v. State, 564 P.2d 1193,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 259

(Wyo. 1977); Jacobs v. State, 641 P.2d 197,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 305

(Wyo. 1982); King v. State, 718 P.2d 452,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 551

(Wyo. 1986); Cowell v. State, 719 P.2d 211,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 552

(Wyo. 1986); Jennings v. State, 806 P.2d 1299,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1991).

The combination of a specific opportunity to commit the crime, with other incriminating facts, was present to establish the defendant's guilt. Jozen v. State, 746 P.2d 1279,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 560

(Wyo. 1987). See, also, Tageant v. State, 737 P.2d 764,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 459

(Wyo. 1987).

The prosecution presented sufficient evidence to support a conviction of burglary where although no measurements were taken, the investigating officer who viewed the comparative sizes of the boots and the prints testified that the prints were consistent with the defendant's boots, where even though the bootprints were pointed-toed and the defendant's boots were squared-toed, the investigating officer testified that a person's gait could explain the disparity, and where with respect to the burglary tools, an expert from the state crime lab testified that paint found on the pry bar was physically and chemically consistent with the paint on the doorjamb at the burglary site, and metallic flakes on the tire iron were physically similar to the metal of the door's locking mechanism. Corson v. State, 766 P.2d 1155,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 179

(Wyo. 1988).

Sufficient evidence supported defendant's conviction for accessory before the fact to burglary of junior high school. See Fales v. State, 908 P.2d 404,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 214

(Wyo. 1995).

Evidence sufficient for jury to infer that defendant intended to commit larceny upon entering high school. See Fales v. State, 908 P.2d 404,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 214

(Wyo. 1995).

The prosecution presented ample corroborating evidence which, when considered with the fact that defendant possessed the stolen items, supported the jury's conclusion that defendant burglarized residence. Sutherland v. State, 944 P.2d 1157,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. 1997).

Evidence was sufficient to support the defendant's burglary conviction where: (1) a witness heard glass break and saw the defendant entering the victim's house, (2) the victim testified that a stud finder and pliers were missing from his garage, (3) the defendant had a stud finder and pliers in his possession when apprehended, and (4) the defendant had told two people he was trying to avoid the police because he had done something earlier that day. Williams v. State, 986 P.2d 855,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1999).

Defendant's burglary conviction was supported by sufficient evidence where in addition to possessing and using the stolen items in the hours after the burglary occurred, the defendant checked into a motel room one block away from where the burglary occurred around the same time that the burglary occurred, and the defendant's vehicle contained tools, including two hammers capable of breaking the rear window of the victim's vehicle, indicating that defendant had both the opportunity and means to commit the burglary. McGarvey v. State, 2002 WY 149, 55 P.3d 703,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 2002).

There was sufficient evidence to convict defendant of two counts of aggravated burglary; the undisputed facts showed that $2 bills and silver coins had been reported missing, defendant was in possession of a large number of $2 bills and silver coins were discovered strewn on the floor at defendant's girlfriend's house, defendant's boots left a print in the snow similar to those found at both crime scenes, the modus operandi in both crimes was similar, firearms reported stolen were recovered in the same location, and defendant's alibi was not verified. Metzer v. State, 2002 WY 176, 59 P.3d 135,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 207

(Wyo. 2002).

Defendant's assertion there was not a nexus between a larceny incident at a legion club, and a nearby home burglary, which occurred hours later, was rejected. Defendant's proximity to the home, which was in the direction defendant fled from the legion club, was a corroborating factor and, upon arrest, defendant attempted to flee, indicating consciousness of guilt. Cureton v. State, 2003 WY 44, 65 P.3d 1250,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 2003).

Evidence was sufficient to sustain a burglary of a vehicle conviction where the victim identified defendant as the only person who could have taken the checkbook from his pickup, a witness identified defendant as the person who retrieved a checkbook from a trash can, and defendant made statements that incriminated him in the larceny of the checkbook. Burkhardt v. State, 2005 WY 96, 117 P.3d 1219,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 2005).

Evidence sufficient to support conviction for aggravated burglary. —

See Rands v. State, 818 P.2d 44,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1991).

Evidence insufficient to support conviction for aggravated burglary. —

Defendant's conviction for aggravated burglary under this section was reversed because the State failed to specify on which ground it was proceeding, either the intent to commit a felony or the intent to commit larceny, and there was insufficient evidence to support both grounds as required; while defendant broke into a house and stabbed two people, there was no evidence that defendant entered the house intending to steal anything. May v. State, 2003 WY 14, 62 P.3d 574,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 2003).

Evidence sufficient to support conviction for conspiracy to
commit aggravated burglary.—

Sufficient
evidence was presented to support defendant's conviction for conspiracy
to commit aggravated burglary because the evidence established that
defendant and an accomplice tacitly agreed to enter the victim's
apartment
without authority to commit a felony, were armed with a
deadly weapon,
and inflicted bodily injury on the victim by stabbing
the victim numerous
times. Johnson v. State, 2015 WY 118, 356 P.3d 767,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 2015).

Evidence of unlawful entry insufficient. —

A police officer's understanding based on hearsay that the defendant did not have permission to enter the building constituted insufficient evidence to prove the element of unlawful entry. Longstreth v. State, 832 P.2d 560,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 1992), reh'g denied,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. June 24, 1992).

Verdict held sufficient. —

In prosecution for entering a building with intent to commit a felony, where court instructed on theory that defendant was either guilty or not guilty, a verdict, finding defendant “guilty of the charge of entering a building and attempting to commit a felony, to wit: robbery, as charged in the information,” was not of doubtful meaning. State v. Kusel, 29 Wyo. 287, 213 P. 367,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1923).

Conviction of lesser included offense within verdict sustained. —

Even though the jury incorrectly concluded that the necessary elements were present to elevate the defendant's crime from burglary to aggravated burglary, an examination of the record disclosed there was sufficient finding that each of the elements of burglary was met. Therefore, the defendant's conviction for the crime of aggravated burglary was set aside, but his conviction was sustained as to the lesser included offense of burglary. Such an action was not a violation of the defendant's due process right under U.S. Const., amend. XIV, § 1 and Wyo. Const., art. 1, § 6, or of his right to a trial by jury under Wyo. Const., art. 1, § 9. Simonds v. State, 762 P.2d 1189,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 1988).

Trial judge fully understood lawful sentencing alternatives, including probation.

See Cook v. State, 710 P.2d 824,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 616

(Wyo. 1985).

Enhancement of sentence. —

This section defines burglary too broadly for a conviction obtained under its provisions to support enhancement of the sentence under Taylor v. United States, 495 U.S. 575, 110 S. Ct. 2143, 109 L. Ed. 2d 607, 1990 U.S. LEXIS 2788 (1990), which attaches a more narrow definition of burglary to the Armed Career Criminal Act, 18 USCS, § 924 (1988). United States v. Barney, 955 F.2d 635, 1992 U.S. App. LEXIS 841 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1992).

Where defendant pled guilty to violating 21 U.S.C.S. §§ 841(a) and 846, and his sentence was enhanced under 21 U.S.C.S. § 841(b)(1)(A), the appellate court rejected defendant's argument that the district court's use of the probable cause affidavit was improper to determine if defendant's prior conviction for burglary under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-3-301(a) was a crime of violence under U.S. Sentencing Guidelines Manual § 4B1.2, United States v. Rice, 110 Fed. Appx. 855,

2004 U.S. App. LEXIS 20896

(10th Cir. 2004).

Defendant, who pled guilty to being a felon in possession of a firearm, a violation of 18 U.S.C.S. §§ 922(g)(1), 924(a)(2), was properly sentenced to 180 months'
imprisonment under the Armed Career Criminal Act (ACCA) as the statute under which he was convicted, Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-3-301(a), criminalized more than generic burglary; the federal court of appeals concluded that his burglaries of commercial buildings and a residence were generic burglaries, which constituted violent felonies for purposes of the ACCA.
United States v. Roberts, 250 Fed. Appx. 843,

2007 U.S. App. LEXIS 23821

(10th Cir. 2007).

Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-3-301

(a) defined burglary more broadly than the United States Supreme Court's generic definition of the term: a person was guilty of burglary if, without authority, he entered or remained in a building, occupied structure or vehicle, or separately secured or occupied portion thereof, with intent to commit a larceny or a felony therein, and therefore, the appellate court had to address the question whether, in the case of defendant, who was convicted under a nongeneric-burglary statute, the government could seek enhancement on the ground that he actually committed a generic burglary. The court found that defendant was convicted of burglary pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-3-301

(a), and the plea colloquy overcame the categorical problem with Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-3-301, its inclusion of vehicles among the places that could have been burglarized; accordingly, the district court did not err in determining that defendant's Wyoming burglary conviction was a burglary for purposes of 18 U.S.C.S. § 924(e).
United States v. Gonzales, 558 F.3d 1193,

2009 U.S. App. LEXIS 5371

(10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 558 U.S. 864, 130 S. Ct. 169, 175 L. Ed. 2d 107, 2009 U.S. LEXIS 5563 (U.S. 2009).

Three-to-10-year sentence for smashing vehicle window and stealing briefcase not abuse of discretion. —

A sentence of three to 10 years for smashing the window of a vehicle and stealing a briefcase because of an alleged debt owed by the vehicle owner, by a defendant with a fairly extensive prior criminal record, including a felony conviction, was not an abuse of discretion, despite the judge stating at a prior sentencing hearing that he would sentence the defendant to some “extra years” if he was lying about the preliminary hearing being waived without his permission, which statement was later withdrawn by the judge. Wright v. State, 703 P.2d 1102,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 520

(Wyo. 1985).

Sentence not abuse of discretion. —

Although the district court failed to comply with W.R.Cr.P. 32, the sentence was well within the ten year maximum punishment for burglary; therefore, the sentence would not be set aside absent a clear abuse of discretion. Wayt v. State, 912 P.2d 1106,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1996).

Guns taken as “loot” in burglary were “deadly weapons”

within the meaning of subsection (c)(i). Britt v. State, 734 P.2d 980,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 416

(Wyo. 1987).

Aggravating factors. —

If the legislature intended for a simulated firearm which cannot fire to satisfy the aggravation provision of this section, it intended for a real firearm, even when it is not loaded, to also satisfy that provision. Sutherland v. State, 944 P.2d 1157,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. 1997).

District court may reduce defendant's sentence of incarceration to probation

after defendant has served only two and one-half months of his sentence of five to eight years for aggravated burglary, in violation of subsections (a) and (c)(ii). State v. Knapp, 739 P.2d 1229,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 473

(Wyo. 1987).

Aggravated burglary and aggravated assault and battery (§

6-2-502

) statutes do not proscribe same offense,

and multiple punishments therefor do not violate the constitutional double jeopardy prohibition.
Lauthern v. State, 769 P.2d 350,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1989).

Convictions for burglary and battery not inconsistent. —

Verdict was not inconsistent, where the jury found the defendant guilty of burglary under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-3-301

, acquitted him of aggravated assault under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-502

, but found him guilty of the lesser included charge of battery under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-501

; in order to find defendant guilty of burglary, the jury only had to determine that the defendant entered the residence with the intent to commit the felony of aggravated assault. Moore v. State, 2003 WY 153, 80 P.3d 191,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 183

(Wyo. 2003).

Double jeopardy.—

Defendant's sentence for the underlying felony, aggravated burglary, was to be vacated as the issuance of convictions for first-degree felony murder and for the underlying felony violated protections against double jeopardy. Schnitker v. State, 2017 WY 96, 401 P.3d 39,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 2017).

Applied

in

Fullmer v. Meacham, 387 P.2d 1007,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1964); Montez v. State, 573 P.2d 34,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 306

(Wyo. 1977); De Herrera v. State, 589 P.2d 845,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 354

(Wyo. 1979); Reinholt v. State, 601 P.2d 1311,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 478

(Wyo. 1979); Jones v. State, 602 P.2d 378,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 482

(Wyo. 1979); Mainville v. State, 607 P.2d 339,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 242

(Wyo. 1980); Chapman v. State, 638 P.2d 1280,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 284

(Wyo. 1982); Schuler v. State, 668 P.2d 1333,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 359

(Wyo. 1983); Fife v. State, 676 P.2d 565,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 255

(Wyo. 1984); MacLaird v. State, 718 P.2d 41,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 533

(Wyo. 1986); Lessard v. State, 719 P.2d 227,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 558

(Wyo. 1986); Heier v. State, 727 P.2d 707,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 636

(Wyo. 1986); Roose v. State, 753 P.2d 574,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1988); Roose v. State, 759 P.2d 478,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1988); Darrow v. State, 824 P.2d 1269,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1992).

Quoted

in

State v. Stern, 526 P.2d 344,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 231

(Wyo. 1974); Robinson v. State, 627 P.2d 168,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 328

(Wyo. 1981); Jessee v. State, 640 P.2d 56,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 290

(Wyo. 1982); Carfield v. State, 649 P.2d 865,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 373

(Wyo. 1982); Lewis v. State, 709 P.2d 1278,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 619

(Wyo. 1985); Bigelow v. State, 768 P.2d 558,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1989); Alexander v. State, 823 P.2d 1198,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1992); Dice v. State, 825 P.2d 379,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1992); Hankinson v. State, 2002 WY 86, 47 P.3d 623,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(Wyo. 2002); Deshazer v. State, 2003 WY 98, 74 P.3d 1240,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 2003).

Stated

in

Collins v. State, 712 P.2d 368,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 451

(Wyo. 1986); Boyd v. State, 747 P.2d 1143,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 573

(Wyo. 1987); Lozano v. State, 751 P.2d 1326,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1988); Marquez v. State, 754 P.2d 705,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 1988).

Cited

in

Heberling v. State, 507 P.2d 1,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. 1973); Stinner v. State, 516 P.2d 185,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 190

(Wyo. 1973); McCutcheon v. State, 604 P.2d 537,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 500

(Wyo. 1979); Ketcham v. State, 618 P.2d 1356,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 320

(Wyo. 1980); Robbins v. State, 635 P.2d 781,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 382

(Wyo. 1981); McCutcheon v. State, 638 P.2d 650,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 281

(Wyo. 1982); Lopez v. State, 643 P.2d 682,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 330

(Wyo. 1982); Grubbs v. State, 669 P.2d 929,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 364

(Wyo. 1983); Bishop v. State, 687 P.2d 242,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 310

(Wyo. 1984); Wright v. State, 718 P.2d 35,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 532

(Wyo. 1986); City of Casper v. Cheatham, 739 P.2d 1222,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 471

(Wyo. 1987); Mollman v. State, 800 P.2d 466,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 1990); Solis v. State, 851 P.2d 1296,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(Wyo. 1993); Wilkening v. State, 922 P.2d 1381,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 1996); Mazurek v. State, 10 P.3d 531,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 182

(Wyo. 2000); United States v. Sparks,

2001 U.S. App. LEXIS 19785

, 265 F.3d 825 (9th Cir. 2001); Andrews v. State, 2002 WY 28, 40 P.3d 708,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 2002); Wilson v. State, 2003 WY 59, 68 P.3d 1181,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. 2003); Deshazer v. State, 2003 WY 98, 74 P.3d 1240,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 119
